Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1481.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 11-103.9, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 11-103.9. A. Except as otherwise provided for in this
section, the State Board of Education shall require, as a condition
of accreditation, that school districts provide to all students
physical education programs which may include athletics.
B. The Board shall require, as a condition of accreditation,
that public elementary schools provide instruction, for students in
full-day kindergarten and grades one through five, in physical
education or exercise programs for a minimum of an average of sixty

(60) minutes each week. The time students participate in recess
shall not be counted toward the sixty-minutes-per-week physical
education requirement. Schools may exclude from participation in
the physical education or exercise programs required in this
subsection those students who have been placed into an in-house in-
school suspension or detention class or placement or those students
who are under an in-school restriction or are subject to an
administrative disciplinary action.
C. The Board shall require, as a condition of accreditation,
that public elementary schools provide to students in full-day
kindergarten and grades one through five, in addition to the
requirements set forth in subsection B of this section, an average
of sixty (60) minutes each week of physical activity, which may
include, but not be limited to, physical education, exercise
programs, fitness breaks, recess, and classroom activities, and
wellness and nutrition education. Each school district board of
education shall determine the specific activities and means of
compliance with the provisions of this subsection, giving
consideration to the recommendations of each school’s Healthy and
Fit School Advisory Committee as submitted to the school principal
pursuant to the provisions of Section 24-100a of this title.
D. The Board shall require, as a condition of accreditation,
that public elementary schools provide to students in full-day
kindergarten and grades one through five, in addition to the
requirements of subsections B and C of this section, forty (40)
minutes of recess per school day, which may be divided into two
recess periods of twenty (20) minutes each. Recess shall consist of
supervised, unstructured time for play. No student shall be
prohibited from participating in recess as a form of discipline.
E. The Board shall disseminate information to each school
district on the benefits of physical education programs and shall
strongly encourage districts to provide physical education
instruction to students in grades six through twelve. The Board
shall also strongly encourage school districts to incorporate
physical activity into the school day by providing to students in
full-day kindergarten and grades one through five at least a twenty-
minute daily recess, which shall be in addition to the sixty (60)
minutes of physical education as required by subsection B of this
ENR. S. B. NO. 1481 Page 2

section, and by allowing all students brief physical activity breaks
throughout the day, physical activity clubs, and special events.
E. F. Instruction in physical education required in by this
section shall be aligned with the subject matter standards as
adopted by the Board.
F. G. The physical education curriculum shall be sequential,
developmentally appropriate, and designed, implemented, and
evaluated to enable students to develop the motor and self-
management skills and knowledge necessary to participate in physical
activity throughout life. Each school district shall establish
specific objectives and goals the district intends to accomplish
through the physical education curriculum.
G. H. In identifying the essential knowledge and skills, the
State Board of Education shall ensure that the subject matter
standards for physical education:
1. Emphasize the knowledge and skills capable of being used
during a lifetime of regular physical activity;
2. Are consistent with national physical education standards
for:
a. the information that students should learn about
physical activity, and
b. the physical activities that students should be able
to perform;
3. Require that, on a weekly basis, at least fifty percent
(50%) of the physical education class be used for actual student
physical activity and that the activity be, to the extent
practicable, at a moderate or vigorous level;
4. Offer students an opportunity to choose among many types of
physical activity in which to participate;
5. Offer students both cooperative and competitive games;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1481 Page 3

6. Meet the needs of students of all physical ability levels,
including students who have a disability, chronic health problem, or
other special need that precludes the student from participating in
regular physical education instruction but who might be able to
participate in physical education that is suitably adapted and, if
applicable, included in the student’s individualized education
program;
7. Teach self-management and movement skills;
8. Teach cooperation, fair play, and responsible participation
in physical activity;
9. Promote student participation in physical activity outside
of school; and
10. Allow physical education classes to be an enjoyable
experience for students.
H. I. The Board shall adopt promulgate rules to implement the
provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1481 Page 4

Passed the Senate the 17th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 16th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1481 Page 5